California statutes. Penal Code
(3) (A) (i) The department shall make college programs available at every state prison for the benefit of inmates who have obtained a general education development certificate or equivalent or a high school diploma. The college programs shall only be provided by the California Community Colleges, the California State University, the University of California, or other accredited public or nonprofit colleges or universities.

(ii) For the purposes of this subparagraph,
 “accredited public or nonprofit colleges or universities” means higher education institutions that grant undergraduate degrees, graduate degrees, or both and that are either public or formed as nonprofit corporations in
 their state and that are accredited by an accreditation agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(B) The department shall prioritize colleges and universities that:

(i) Provide face-to-face, classroom-based instruction.

(ii) Provide comprehensive in-person student supports, including counseling, advising, tutoring, and library services.

(iii) Offer transferable degree-building pathways.

(iv) Facilitate real-time
 student-to-student interaction and learning.

(v) Coordinate with other colleges and universities serving students in the department so that inmate students who are transferred to another institution can continue building toward a degree or credential.

(vi) Coordinate with the California Community Colleges Rising Scholars Network, the California State University Project Rebound Consortium, the University of California Underground Scholars Initiative, or other nonprofit postsecondary programs specifically serving formerly incarcerated students so that incarcerated students who are paroled receive support to continue building toward a degree or credential.

(vii) Do not charge incarcerated students or their families for tuition, course materials, or other educational components.

(viii) Waive or offer grant aid to cover tuition, course materials, or other educational components for incarcerated students.

(C) Accredited postsecondary education providers shall be responsible for:

(i) Determining and developing their curricula and degree pathways.

(ii) Determining certificate pathways, in consultation with, and with the approval of, the department.

(iii) Providing instructional staff and academic advising or counseling staff.

(iv) Determining what specific services, including, but not limited to tutoring, academic counseling, library, and career advising, shall be offered to ensure incarcerated students can
 successfully complete their course of study.

(D) An inmate who is enrolled, pursuant to this section, in a degree-granting college or university program equivalent to full-time postsecondary enrollment, as defined by state regulations for the respective degree, shall receive the same privileges as an inmate with a full-time work or training assignment.

(E) Subparagraph (B) does not prevent an inmate from enrolling on their own, independent of the department, in a postsecondary education course that does not meet the criteria specified in that subparagraph.

(4) While the department shall offer education to target populations, priority shall be given to those with a criminogenic need for education, those who have a need based on their educational achievement level, or other factors as determined by the department.

(b) In complying with the requirements of this section, the department shall give strong consideration to the use of libraries and librarians, computer-assisted training, and other innovations that have proven to be effective in reducing illiteracy among disadvantaged adults.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 6.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2053.4.

The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall appoint a Superintendent of Correctional Education, who shall oversee and administer all prison education programs. The Superintendent of Correctional Education shall set both short- and long-term goals for inmate literacy and testing and career technical education programs, and shall establish priorities for prison academic and career technical education programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 789, Sec. 2.   (AB 1019)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2053.5.

Consistent with the goals and priorities of the department, a career technical education program shall consider all of the following factors:

(a) Whether the program aligns with the
 workforce needs of high-demand sectors of the state and regional economies.

(b) Whether there is an active job market for the skills being developed where the inmate will likely be released.

(c) Whether the program increases the number of inmates who obtain a marketable and industry or apprenticeship board-recognized certification, credential, or degree.

(d) Whether there are formal or informal networks in the field that support finding employment upon release from prison.

(e) Whether
 the program will lead to employment in occupations with a livable wage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 789, Sec. 3.   (AB 1019)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2054.

(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may establish and maintain classes for inmates by utilizing personnel of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or by entering into an agreement with the governing board of a school district or private school or the governing boards of school districts under which the district shall maintain classes for such inmates. The governing board of a school district or private school may enter into such an agreement regardless of whether the institution or facility at which the classes are to be established and maintained is within or without the boundaries of the school district.

(b) Any agreement entered into
 between the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and a school district or private school pursuant to this section may require the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to reimburse the school district or private school for the cost to the district or private school of maintaining such classes. “Cost” as used in this section includes contributions required of any school district to the State Teachers’ Retirement System, but such cost shall not include an amount in excess of the amount expended by the district for salaries of the teachers for such classes, increased by one-fifth. Salaries of such teachers for the purposes of this section shall not exceed the salaries as set by the governing board for teachers in other classes for adults maintained by the district, or private schools.

(c) Attendance or average daily attendance in classes established pursuant to this section or in classes in trade and industrial
 education or vocational training for adult inmates of institutions or facilities under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall not be reported to the State Department of Education for apportionment and no apportionment from the State School Fund shall be made on account of average daily attendance in such classes.

(d) No school district or private school shall provide for the academic education of adult inmates of state institutions or facilities under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation except in accordance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 798, Sec. 2.   (SB 343)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2054.2.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall determine and implement a system of incentives to increase inmate participation in, and completion of, academic and vocational education, consistent with the inmate’s educational needs as identified in the assessment performed pursuant to Section 3020, including, but not limited to, a literacy level specified in Section 2053.1, a high school diploma or equivalent, completion of a community college or four-year academic degree, or a particular vocational job skill. These incentives may be consistent with other incentives provided to inmates who participate in work programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 798, Sec. 4.   (SB 343)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2055.

The Director of Corrections may, in his discretion, from time to time insure any or all products produced at any prison or institution under the jurisdiction of the Director of Corrections, whether the products are finished or unfinished, the materials from which such products are made or to be made, and the equipment necessary for the production thereof, against any or all risks of loss, wherever such products, materials, or equipment are located, while in the possession of the Department of Corrections and while in transit thereto or therefrom or in storage, in such amounts as the director deems proper. The cost of such insurance shall be paid from the Correctional Industries Revolving Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 887.)
-------------------------------------------

2056.

If any of the shops or buildings in which convicts are employed require rebuilding or repair for any reason, they may be rebuilt or repaired immediately, under the direction of the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 31.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2057.

Counties are authorized to contract with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for the commitment to the department, of persons who have suffered a felony conviction. An offender sentenced to a county jail that serves his or her sentence in the state prison pursuant to this section shall be required to comply with the rules and regulations of the department consistent with Division 3 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 34.   (AB 117)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Addition and amendment operative October 1, 2011, pursuant to Secs. 68 and 69 of Ch. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

2059.

The department shall fix the compensation of its officers and employees, other than those of wardens and clerks, at a gross rate which shall include a cash allowance for board and lodging, but in no case shall the money compensation, exclusive of the cash allowance for board and lodging, be less than one hundred ten dollars ($110) per month. There shall be deducted from the gross salaries of the officers and employees of the prison the value of any board, lodging, services or supplies rendered or sold to each such officer or employee. The deduction for board and lodging shall not exceed the cash allowance therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2256.)
-------------------------------------------

2060.

For the purposes of Sections 11009 and 11030 of the Government Code, the following constitute, among other proper purposes, state business for officers and employees of the department for which such officers and employees shall be allowed actual and necessary traveling expenses when the state travel and expense have been approved by the Governor and the Director of Finance as provided in that section.

Attending meetings of any national association or organization, having as its principal purpose the study of matters relating to penology, including prison management and paroles, or to a particular field thereof, conferring with officers or employees of the United States relative to problems relating to penology, including prison management and paroles, in California, conferring with officers or employees of other states engaged in the performance of similar duties, and obtaining information useful to the department in the conduct of its work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

2061.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall develop and implement, by January 15, 2008, a plan to address management deficiencies within the department. The plan should, at a minimum, address all of the following:

(1) Filling vacancies in management positions within the department.

(2) Improving lines of accountability within the department.

(3) Standardizing processes to improve management.

(4) Improving communication within headquarters, between headquarters, institutions and parole offices, and between institutions and parole offices.

(5) Developing and implementing more comprehensive plans for management of the prison inmate and parole populations.

(b) The department may contract with an outside entity that has expertise in management of complex public and law enforcement organizations to assist in identifying and addressing deficiencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 7, Sec. 7.   Effective May 3, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2062.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall develop and implement a plan to obtain additional rehabilitation and treatment services for prison inmates and parolees. The plan shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Plans to fill vacant state staff positions that provide direct and indirect rehabilitation and treatment services to inmates and parolees.

(2) Plans to fill vacant staff positions that provide custody and supervision services for inmates and parolees.

(3) Plans to obtain from local governments and contractors services for parolees needing treatment while in the community and services that can be brought to inmates within prisons.

(4) Plans to enter into agreements with community colleges to accelerate training and education of rehabilitation and treatment personnel, and modifications to the licensing and certification requirements of state licensing agencies that can accelerate the availability and hiring of rehabilitation and treatment personnel.

(b) The department shall submit the plan and a schedule for implementation of its provisions to the Legislature by January 15, 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 7, Sec. 8.   Effective May 3, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2063.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall regularly provide operational and fiscal information to the Legislature to allow it to better assess the performance of the department in critical areas of operations, including to both evaluate the effectiveness of department programs and activities, as well as assess how efficiently the department is using state resources.

(b) No later than January 10 of each year, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee operational and fiscal information to be displayed in the Governor’s proposed budget. This information shall include data for the three most recently ended fiscal years, and shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Per capita costs, average daily population, and offender to staff ratios for each of the following:

(A) Adult inmates housed in state prisons.

(B) Adult inmates housed in Community Correctional Facilities and out-of-state facilities.

(C) Adult parolees supervised in the community.

(D) Juvenile wards housed in state facilities.

(E) Juvenile parolees supervised in the community.

(2) Total expenditures and average daily population for each adult and juvenile institution.

(3) Number of established positions and percent of those positions vacant on June 30 for each of the following classifications within the department:

(A) Correctional officer.

(B) Correctional sergeant.

(C) Correctional lieutenant.

(D) Parole agent.

(E) Youth correctional counselor.

(F) Youth correctional officer.

(G) Physician.

(H) Registered nurse.

(I) Psychiatrist.

(J) Psychologist.

(K) Dentist.

(L) Teacher.

(M) Vocational instructor.

(N) Licensed vocational nurse.

(4) Average population of juvenile wards classified by board category.

(5) Average population of adult inmates classified by security level.

(6) Average population of adult parolees classified by supervision level.

(7) Number of new admissions from courts, parole violators with new terms, and parole violators returned to custody.

(8) Number of probable cause hearings, revocation hearings, and parole suitability hearings conducted.

(9) For both adult and juvenile facilities, the number of budgeted slots, actual enrollment, and average daily attendance for institutional academic and vocational education and substance abuse programs.

(10) Average population of mentally ill offenders classified by Correctional Clinical Case Management System or Enhanced Outpatient Program status, as well as information about mentally ill offenders in more acute levels of care.

(c) No later than January 10 of each year, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee a supplemental report containing operational and fiscal information in addition to data provided in subdivision (b). To the extent possible and relevant, the department shall seek to keep the categories of information provided the same each year so as to provide consistency. This report shall contain information for the three most recently ended fiscal years, and shall include, but is not limited to, data on the operational level and outcomes associated with the following categories:

(1) Adult prison security operations, including use of disciplinary measures and special housing assignments such as placements in administrative segregation, Security Housing Units, and sensitive needs yards, identifying these placements by offender categories such as security level and mental health classification.

(2) Adult prison education and treatment programs, including academic education, vocational training, prison industries, substance abuse treatment, and sex offender treatment.

(3) Adult prison health care operations, including medical, mental, and dental health.

(4) Adult parole operations, including number of discharges from parole supervision and provision of various treatment and sanction programs.

(5) Board of Parole Hearings, including the total number of parole suitability hearings scheduled for inmates serving life sentences each year, the number of parole suitability hearings postponed each year and the reasons for postponement, and the backlog of parole suitability hearings.

(5.1) Board of Parole Hearings, including the total number of adult parole revocation cases with probable cause hearings scheduled each year, the percent of parole revocation cases with probable cause hearings held within 10 business days, as well as the percent of adult parole revocation cases completed within 35 calendar days.

(6) Juvenile institution security operations, including use of disciplinary measures and special housing assignments such as special management programs, as well as the impact of time that adds or cuts the length of confinement.

(7) Juvenile institutional education and treatment programs, including academic education, vocational training, substance abuse treatment, and sex offender treatment.

(8) Juvenile institutional health care operations, including medical, mental, and dental health.

(9) Juvenile parole operations, including the number of juvenile parolees returned to state institutions and provision of various treatment and sanction programs.

(9.1) Juvenile Parole Board, including juvenile parole revocation hearings.

(d) To the extent any of the information in subdivision (b) or (c) falls under the purview of the federally appointed receiver over medical care services, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall, to the best of its ability, coordinate with the receiver in obtaining this information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 175, Sec. 7.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall regularly provide to the Legislature information on the outcomes of department operations and activities to allow the Legislature to better assess the performance of the department, including both to evaluate the effectiveness of department programs and activities, as well as to assess how efficiently the department is using state resources.

(b) No later than January 10 each year, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee an annual report on the outcomes of department operations and activities specified in the supplemental report of the annual
 Budget Act for the current fiscal year. At a minimum, for each performance measurement included in the supplemental report of the annual Budget Act for the current fiscal year, the department’s report shall include data for the three most recently ended fiscal years, as well as establish target performance goals for each performance measurement for the current fiscal year identified in the supplemental report of the annual Budget Act and in the department’s long-term strategic plan, if included in the strategic plan. If target performance goals stated in the prior department report have not been achieved, the annual department report for the current fiscal year shall include an explanation of why the target performance goals were not achieved. The supplemental report of the annual Budget Act may identify changes in the department’s reporting requirements; however, if no changes are identified in the supplemental report of the annual Budget Act, the reporting requirements shall be the same as those for the
 prior fiscal year.

(c) The department shall also post the full annual report required by this section on its Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 729, Sec. 3.   (AB 1628)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.1.

(a) On or before October 1 of each year, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit to the Legislature a report on the department’s efforts to respond to and prevent suicides and attempted suicides among inmates. The information contained in the report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A description of progress toward meeting the department’s goals related to the completion of suicide risk evaluations in a sufficient manner. 

(2) A description of progress toward meeting the department’s goals related to the completion of 72 hour treatment plans in a sufficient manner. 

(3) A description of the department’s efforts to ensure that all required staff receive training related to suicide prevention and response.

(4) A description of the department’s progress in implementing the recommendations made by the special master regarding inmate suicides and attempts, to include the results of any audits the department conducts, at the headquarters or regional level, as part of its planned audit process to measure the success of changes the department implements as a result of these recommendations.

(5) A description of the department’s progress in identifying and implementing initiatives that are designed to reduce risk factors associated with suicide.

(6) A description of the department’s efforts and progress to expand upon its process of notification pursuant to Section 5022,
 including expansion of those notifications in cases of suicide attempts when deemed appropriate by the department, and when inmates have consented to allow release of that information.

(b) The report shall be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code. 

(c) The report shall also be posted on the department’s Internet Web site in an easily accessible format.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 782, Sec. 1.   (SB 960)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2065.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall complete all of the tasks associated with inmates granted medical parole pursuant to Section 3550 that are specified in this section. Subdivisions (c) and (d) shall apply only to the period of time that inmates are on medical parole.

(b) The department shall seek to enter into memoranda of understanding with federal, state, or county entities necessary to facilitate prerelease agreements to help inmates initiate benefits claims.

(c) This subdivision shall be implemented in a manner that is consistent with federal Medicaid law and regulations. The Director of Health Care Services shall seek any necessary
 federal approvals for the implementation of this subdivision. Claiming of federal Medicaid funds shall be implemented only to the extent that federal approval, if necessary, is obtained. If an inmate is granted medical parole and found to be eligible for Medi-Cal, all of the following shall apply:

(1) Hospitals, nursing facilities, and other providers providing services to medical parolees shall invoice the department in accordance with contracted rates of reimbursement or, if no contract is in place, pursuant to Section 5023.5. 

(2) Upon receipt of an acceptable claim, the department shall reimburse hospitals, nursing facilities, and other providers for services provided to medical parolees in accordance with contracted rates of reimbursement or, if no contract is in place, pursuant to Section 5023.5. 

(3) The department shall submit a quarterly invoice to the State Department of Health Care Services for medical parolees who are eligible for Medi-Cal for federal claiming and reimbursement of allowable federal Medicaid funds.

(4) The State Department of Health Care Services shall remit funds received for federal financial participation to the department.

(5) The department and the State Department of Health Care Services shall work together to do all of the following:

(A) Maximize federal financial participation for service costs, administrative costs, and targeted case management costs incurred pursuant to this section.

(B) Determine whether medical parolees shall be exempt from mandatory
 enrollment in managed health care, including county organized health plans, and determine the proper prior authorization process for individuals who have been granted medical parole.

(6) The department may submit retroactive Medi-Cal claims, in accordance with state and federal law and regulations to the State Department of Health Care Services for allowable certified public expenditures that have been reimbursed by the department. The department shall work with the Director of Health Care Services to ensure that any process established regarding the submission of retroactive claims shall be in compliance with state and federal law and regulations.

(d) If an inmate is granted medical parole and found to be ineligible for Medi-Cal, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The department shall consider the income and
 assets of a medical parolee to determine whether the individual has the ability to pay for the cost of his or her medical care.

(2) If the individual is unable to pay the cost of their medical care, the department shall establish contracts with appropriate medical providers and pay costs that are allowable pursuant to Section 5023.5.

(3) The department shall retain the responsibility to perform utilization review and cost management functions that it currently performs under existing contracts with health care facilities.

(4) The department shall directly provide, or provide reimbursement for, services associated with conservatorship or public guardianship.

(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of
 Part 1 of Division 2 of the Government Code, the department and the State Department of Health Care Services may implement this section by means of all-facility letters, all-county letters, or similar instructions, in addition to adopting regulations, as necessary.

(f) Notwithstanding any other state law, and only to the extent that federal law allows and federal financial participation is available, for the limited purpose of implementing this section, the department or its designees are authorized to act on behalf of an inmate for purposes of applying for redetermination of Medi-Cal eligibility and sharing and maintaining records with the State Department of Health Care Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 41, Sec. 69.   (SB 1021)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2066.

(a) Pursuant to Section 715 of the Military and Veterans Code, the Department of Veterans Affairs shall provide one employee, trained and accredited by the Department of Veterans Affairs, for every five state
 prisons to assist incarcerated veterans in applying for and receiving any federal or other veterans’ benefits for which they or their families may be eligible.

(b) The department shall give a Department of Veterans Affairs’ employee described in subdivision (a) access to the hardware, software, and those computer networks as are reasonably necessary to perform his or her duties while at the prison, while taking all necessary safety precautions.

(c) The department shall cooperate and collaborate with the Department of Veterans Affairs to ensure that a Department of Veterans Affairs’ employee described in subdivision (a) has the greatest access and effectiveness practicable, while taking all necessary safety precautions, in order to assist veterans
 incarcerated within the state prisons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 599, Sec. 2.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2067.

(a) As outlined in the Budget Act of 2018, it is anticipated that all California inmates will be returned from out-of-state contract correctional facilities by February 2019. To the extent that the adult offender population continues to decline, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall begin reducing private in-state male contract correctional facilities in a manner that maintains sufficient flexibility to comply with the federal court order to maintain the prison population at or below 137.5 percent of design capacity. The private in-state male contract correctional facilities that are primarily staffed by non-Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation personnel shall be prioritized for reduction over other in-state contract correctional facilities.

(b) As the population of offenders in private in-state male contract correctional facilities identified in subdivision (a) is reduced, and to the extent that the adult offender population continues to decline, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall accommodate the projected population decline by reducing the capacity of state-owned and operated prisons or in-state leased or contract correctional facilities, in a manner that maximizes long-term state facility savings, leverages long-term investments, and maintains sufficient flexibility to comply with the federal court order to maintain the prison population at or below 137.5 percent of design capacity. In reducing this additional capacity, the department shall take into consideration the following factors, including, but not limited to:

(1) The cost to operate at the capacity.

(2) Workforce
 impacts.

(3) Subpopulation and gender-specific housing needs.

(4) Long-term investment in state-owned and operated correctional facilities, including previous investments.

(5) Public safety and rehabilitation.

(6) The durability of the state’s solution to prison overcrowding.

(c) The following shall apply:

(1) Subdivision (b) shall not be enforceable by a private right of action.

(2) Subdivision (b) does not create an act or duty enforceable under Sections 1060 or 1085 of the Code
 of Civil Procedure.

(3) A city, county, city and county, local district, or special district shall not maintain an action or proceeding against the State of California pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) An action initiated regarding this section shall be brought in the superior court of the County of Sacramento.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 58, Sec. 16.   (AB 200)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2068.

(a) The department shall collect voluntary self-identification information pertaining to race or ethnic origin of people admitted, in custody, and released and paroled, which shall include, but not be limited to, American Indian/Alaskan Native, Bangladeshi, Black, Cambodian, Chinese, Colombian, Cuban, Fijian, Filipino, Guamanian or Chamorro, Guatemalan, Native Hawaiian, Other Hispanic Not Listed, Hmong, Indian, Indonesian, Jamaican, Japanese, Korean, Laotian, Malaysian, Mexican, Nicaraguan, Other, Other Asian Not Listed, Other Pacific Islander Not Listed, Pakistani, Puerto Rican, Salvadorian, Samoan, Sri Lankan, Taiwanese, Thai, Tongan, Unknown, Vietnamese, and White. Based on that voluntary self-identification information, the department shall prepare and publish monthly demographic data pertaining to the race
 or ethnic origin of people admitted, in custody, and released and paroled, disaggregated by the same race and ethnicity categories used by the department for the purpose of voluntary self-identification information.

(b) Starting January 1, 2025, the data, except for personally identifying information, which shall be deemed confidential, shall be publicly available on the department’s internet website via the Offender Data Points dashboard.

(c) If the population number of any race or ethnicity category is under 50, the department shall only reference, in the published data, those numbers as “fewer than 50” in order to protect personally identifying information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 459, Sec. 2.   (AB 943)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Wardens [2078. - 2090.]

2078.

It shall be the duty of the department to prosecute all suits, at law or in equity, that may be necessary to protect the rights of the State in matters of property connected with the prisons and their management, such suits to be prosecuted in the name of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1944, 3rd [1st] Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2080.

A copy of the rules and regulations prescribing the duties and obligations of prisoners shall be furnished to each prisoner in a state prison or other facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2047 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 933.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.

The director shall cause to be kept at each institution a register of institution violations and what kind of punishments, if any, are administered to prisoners or inmates; the offense committed; the rule or rules violated; the nature of punishment administered; the authority ordering such punishment; the duration of time during which the offender was subjected to punishment; and the condition of the prisoner’s health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1666.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.5.

The Director of Corrections shall keep complete case records of all prisoners under custody of the department, which records shall be made available to the Board of Prison Terms at such times and in such form as the board may prescribe.

Case records shall include all information received by the Director of Corrections from the courts, probation officers, sheriffs, police departments, district attorneys, State Department of Justice, Federal Bureau of Investigation, and other interested agencies and persons. Case records shall also include a record of diagnostic findings, considerations, actions and dispositions with respect to
 classification, treatment, employment, training, and discipline as related to the institutional correctional program followed for each prisoner.

The director shall appoint, after consultation with the Board of Prison Terms, such employees of the various institutions under his control as may be necessary for the proper performance of the duties of the Board of Prison Terms, and when requested shall also have in attendance at hearings of the Board of Prison Terms, psychiatric or medical personnel. The director shall furnish, after consultation with the Board of Prison Terms and the Director of General Services, such hearing rooms and other physical facilities at such institutions as may be necessary for the proper performance of the duties of the Board of Prison Terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

2082.

The Director of Corrections shall within 30 days after receiving persons convicted of crime and sentenced to serve terms in the respective prisons under the jurisdiction of the Director of Corrections, except those cases under juvenile court commitment, furnish to the Department of Justice two copies of a report containing the fingerprints and descriptions, including complete details of marks, scars, deformities, or other peculiarities, and a statement of the nature of the offense for which the person is committed. One copy shall be transmitted by the Department of Justice to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The director shall notify the Department of
 Justice whenever any of the prisoners dies, escapes, is discharged, released on parole, transferred to or returned from a state hospital, taken out to court or returned therefrom, or whose custody is terminated in any other manner. The Director of Corrections may furnish to the Department of Justice such other fingerprints and information as may be useful for law enforcement purposes. Any expenditures incurred in carrying out the provisions of this section shall be paid for out of the appropriation made for the support of state’s prisons or the Department of Corrections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 196, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2084.

(a) The department shall provide each prisoner with a bed, sufficient covering of blankets, and with garments of substantial material and of distinctive manufacture, and with sufficient plain and wholesome food of such variety as may be most conducive to good health and that shall include the availability of plant-based meals.

(b) The department shall develop a plan to make available the plant-based meals described in subdivision (a) on an overall cost-neutral basis.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “plant-based meals” shall mean entire meals that contain no animal products or byproducts, including meat, poultry, fish, dairy, or eggs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 512, Sec. 3.   (SB 1138)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2084.3.

(a) Incarcerated persons shall be permitted to shower at least every other day, unless access to a shower is prohibited as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) Whenever a request for a shower pursuant to subdivision (a), or a request for a shower at any other time, is denied, the decision to prohibit showering shall be approved by the facility manager or their designee, and the reason or reasons for prohibiting an incarcerated person to shower shall be documented.
